New Jersey, session 221, S1677.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the Feminine Hygiene Products Safety Act. 2.    For  purposes of this act: Ingredient means a substance that is present in any quantity in a menstrual product. Menstrual product means a product manufactured for the purpose of catching menstruation and vaginal discharge, including but not limited to a tampon, sanitary pad, disc, menstrual cup, and underwear.  The term shall include both disposable and reusable products. 3.    a.  Every package or box containing menstrual products that is sold or offered for sale in this State shall contain a label listing all of the ingredients contained in the menstrual product and the percentage of each ingredient.  The information shall be printed on the outside of the package or box, and displayed in a manner that stands alone and is bold, conspicuous, and easily understandable to consumers. b.    Every package or box containing tampons that is sold or offered for sale in this State shall contain a warning about the dangers of toxic shock syndrome printed on the front of the package or box. The warning shall be displayed in a manner that stands alone and is bold, conspicuous, and easily understandable to consumers. The warning shall include a safety alert symbol and the signal word DANGER. c.     Every package or box containing tampons that is sold or offered for sale in this State shall contain a warning about the dangers of toxic shock syndrome printed on the side and the inside flap of the package or box. The warning shall be displayed in a manner that stands alone and is bold, conspicuous, and easily  understandable to consumers. The warning shall include the following: (1)   a list of the warning signs of toxic shock syndrome; (2)   instructions on action to take if the warning signs appear, including the need to remove the tampon at once and seek medical attention immediately: (3)   information concerning the advisability of using tampons with the minimum absorbency needed to control menstrual flow in order to reduce the risk; (4)   information concerning avoiding the risk of getting tampon-associated toxic shock syndrome by not using tampons, and reducing the risk by using alternative menstrual products; (5)   information concerning the need to seek medical attention before again using tampons if toxic shock syndrome warning signs have occurred in the past, or if a consumer has any questions about toxic shock syndrome or tampon use; and (6)   any other information required to be provided to consumers in accordance with federal law or regulation. d. It shall be an unlawful practice and a violation of P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.) to manufacture a package or box containing menstrual products that does not meet the requirements of subsection a. and subsection b. of this section. 4.    The provisions of this act shall apply to menstrual products manufactured on or after the effective date of this act. 5.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following the date of enactment.